hu: Szél típusa: Kombinált; Hullámos (granton); Homorú; Mikrobarázdált; Hornyolt; Fogazott; Egyenes; Kúpos; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ hrany: Kombinácia; Granton; Dutý; Mikrozúbkovaný; Vrúbkovaný; Zúbkovaný; Rovný; Zúžený; Iné
da: Kanttype: Kombineret; Granton; Hul; Mikrosavtakket; Indhakket; Tækket; Lige; Tilspidset; Andet
zh-CN: 边缘样式: 混合肤质; 格兰顿; 中空; 微锯齿; 齿形; 有锯齿; 直; 锥形; 其他
th: ประเภทขอบ: ผมแบบผสม; แกรนตัน; รูกลวง; ฟันปลา; มีรอยบาก; หยัก; ผมตรง; ตัดเฉียง; อื่นๆ
de: Kantentyp: Kombination; Granton; Hohl; Micro-serrated; Notched; Serrated; Glatt; Tapered; Sonstiges
tr: Kenar tipi: Kombinasyon; Granton; Oyuk; Mikro tırtıklı; Çentikli; Tırtıklı; Düz; Konik; Diğer
sv: Typ av kant: Kombination; Granton; Ihålig; Mikrotandad; Naggad; Sågtandad; Rakt; Avsmalnande; Övrigt
pl: Typ krawędzi: Kombinacja; Granton; Płytki; Mikro ząbkowanie; Nacięty; Ząbkowane; Prosta; Zwężane; Inne
nl: Type rand: Combinatie; Granton; Hol; Microvertand; Inkeping; Getand; Steil; Taps toelopend; Andere
lt-LT: Ašmenų tipas: Kombinuotas; Reljefinis; Tuščiaviduris; Smulkiai dantytas; Su įrantomis; Dantytas; Tiesus; Smailėjantis; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta roba: Kombinacija; Granton; Z vdolbinami; Mikro nazobčan; Zarezan; Nazobčan; Ravno; Stožčast; Drugo
vi: Loại cạnh: Da hỗn hợp; Dao Granton; Rỗng; Răng cưa siêu nhỏ; Có khía; Khía răng cưa; Tóc thẳng; Vót nhọn; Khác
ja: エッジタイプ: 混合タイプ; グラントン; 中空; マイクロセレーテッド; ノッチ付き; セレーテッド; ストレート; テーパード; その他
nb: Kanttype: Kombinasjon; Granton; Hul; Mikroserrert; Hakket; Serrert; Rett; Avsmalnet; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de borda: Combinação; Granton; Vazio; Microsserrilhada; Entalhado; Serrilhado; Liso; Cônica; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de borda: Mista; Granton; Oco; Microserrilhada; Dentada; Serrilhada; Liso; Afunilado; Outro
en: Edge type: Combination; Granton; Hollow; Micro-serrated; Notched; Serrated; Straight; Tapered; Other
el: Τύπος άκρης: Συνδυαστική; Granton; Κοίλη; Μικροοδοντωτή; Με εγκοπές; Οδοντωτή; Ευθεία; Κωνική; Άλλο
zh-TW: 邊緣型: 混合性; 雕刻刀; 空心; 鋸齒; 凹槽; 鋸齒狀; 直; 楔型; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta rezaćeg brida: Kombinirani; Granton; Šuplji; Mikronazubljeni; Reckasti; Nazubljeni; Ravni; Suženog vrha; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип ръб: Комбинация; Granton; Кух; Микронабразден; Врязан; Назъбен; Прав; Конусовиден; Други
ro-RO: Tip margine: Combinație; Granton; Concavă; Micro-zimțată; Crestată; Zimțată; Dreaptă; Conică; Altele
fi: Reunatyyppi: Yhdistelmä; Granton; Ontto; Mikrohampainen; Lovitettu; Sahalaitainen; Suorat; Kapeneva; Muu
it: Tipo di bordo: Mista; Granton; Cava; Micro-seghettato; Dentellato; Serrata; Dritto; Affusolato; Altro
fr: Type de bord: Mixte; Granton; Creusée; Micro-dentelé; Encoché; Cranté; Lisses; Directionnel marqué; Autre
es: Tipo de borde: Combinación; Granton; Hueco; Microdentado; Muescas; Dentado; Liso; Cónico; Otros
ko: 엣지 타입: 복합; 그랜튼; 할로우; 마이크로 톱니; 노치드; 톱니형; 일자형; 테이퍼드; 기타
cs: Typ okraje: Kombinace; Granton; Dutý; Mikrovroubkovaná; Vroubkovaná; Zoubkovaná; Rovné; Tapered; Jiné
ru: Тип кромки: Комбинация; Грантон; Полая; Микро-зубчатые; С выемками; Зубчатые; Прямые; Конические; Другой